Massachusetts, session 194th, H2131.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 152 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by striking out section 27 in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the following:-
Section 27. If the employee is injured by reason of his serious willful misconduct,
including intoxication or unlawful use of a controlled substance, as defined in section 1 of
chapter 94C, he shall not receive compensation or any portion of the benefit; provided, that this
provision shall not bar compensation or benefits to his or her dependents if the injury results in
death.
of 1